Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-340
Bonds and interest; annual tax levy to pay at maturity.

It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors in making the annual tax levy as provided in section 31-333, to take into account the maturing bonds and interest on all bonds, and make ample provisions in advance for the payment thereof.

Laws 1907, c. 152, § 4, p. 472;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 10, p. 522;

R.S.1913, § 1835;

C.S.1922, § 1782;

C.S.1929, § 31-439;

R.S.1943, § 31-340.